Massachusetts, session 194th, H2348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 37. (a) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate
regulations related to exclusionary zoning, which shall include: (i) a definition of exclusionary
zoning; (ii) a process by which residents, developers and other parties that believe that a
municipality is engaging in exclusionary zoning can bring a claim to the executive office; and
(iii) a review process in which the executive office may make a determination that a municipality
has engaged in exclusionary zoning.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, if the executive office
determines that a municipality has engaged in exclusionary zoning, the executive office may take
authority over the municipality’s zoning for a period of at least 4 years. After 4 years from the
date of the executive office’s determination, the municipality may petition the executive office to
regain control of the municipality’s zoning.
of 1